Missouri, session 2026, SB1659.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 320, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 320.223, to read as
follows:
320.223. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Fire Life-Safety Damper Inspection
Verification Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Approved skills training program", a Class A
apprenticeship registered with the United States Department
of Labor or a state apprenticeship agency, totaling at least
eight thousand hours of practical HVAC experience and
including fire-safety-related HVAC skills;
(2) "Combination fire and smoke damper", a device that
meets both fire damper and smoke damper requirements;
(3) "Department", the department of public safety;
(4) "Enforcing agency", a state or local fire marshal
who has been granted the authority to enforce state or local
fire protection statutes;
(5) "Fire damper", a device installed in ducts or air-
transfer openings that closes on heat detection to resist

SB 1659 2
flame or dynamic dampers that are rated for elevated-
temperature airflow;
(6) "Fire life-safety damper", any fire damper, smoke
damper, or combination fire-and-smoke damper;
(7) "Fire life-safety damper testing", physical and
visual inspection or testing required by the National Fire
Protection Association's standards 80, 92, and l05 and this
section to verify proper damper operation;
(8) "HVAC", heating, ventilation, and air-conditioning;
(9) "ICB", the International Certification Board;
(10) "ISO/IEC 17024", the International Organization
for Standard 17024, Conformity Assessment-General
Requirements for Bodies Operating Certification of Persons;
(11) "NFPA 80", the National Fire Protection
Association standard 80, Standard for Fire Doors and Other
Opening Protectives;
(12) "NFPA 105", the National Fire Protection
Association standard 105, Standard for Smoke Door
Assemblies and Other Opening Protectives;
(13) "Smoke damper", a device installed in ducts or
air-transfer openings that resists smoke passage and
operates automatically by a detection system.
3. This section shall apply to every fire life-safety
damper required by any political subdivision's code or
standard that requires a fire life-safety damper other than
those in one- and two-family dwellings or townhouses three
stories or fewer above grade plane.
4. In any political subdivision that requires a fire
life-safety damper, each fire life-safety damper shall be:
(1) Tested for acceptance within twelve months after
its installation; and

SB 1659 3
(2) Thereafter periodically tested not less than once
every four years thereafter.
5. All tests and inspections required by this section
shall comply with NFPA 80(2016) and NFPA 105(2016). Remote
methods shall not replace physical visual inspection.
6. The following qualifications are required to
perform tests and inspections required by this section:
(1) A contractor providing smoke damper, fire damper,
combination fire-and-smoke damper testing or inspection
services shall hold an ICB Fire and Smoke Damper Contractor
Certification or equivalent certification from an
organization that has been accredited under the ISO/IEC
17024 Personnel Certification standard in HVAC Fire Life-
Safety Damper inspections;
(2) A person performing smoke dampers, fire dampers,
or combination fire-and-smoke dampers testing or inspection
services shall:
(a) Be employed by an enforcing agency or by a
contractor certified in accordance with subdivision (1) of
this subsection;
(b) Have successfully completed an approved skill
training program, or be enrolled in an approved skill
training program, and be working under the supervision of a
person having completed such a program; and
(c) Hold a certification from the ICB as a Fire and
Smoke Damper Technician or an equivalent certification from
an organization that has been accredited under the ISO/IEC
17024 Personnel Certification standard in HVAC Life Safety
Damper inspections.
7. After the required testing and inspection, if the
smoke damper, fire damper, or combination fire-and-smoke
damper passes the applicable inspections and tests, the

SB 1659 4
person performing the inspection or test shall execute a
compliance certification that shall verify such compliance,
and provide the name of the individual or individuals
conducting the inspection or test and that person's
employer; the name of the building owner and address of the
property; the location of all smoke dampers, fire dampers,
and combination fire-and-smoke dampers; and the date of the
inspection or test. The building owner shall maintain a
copy of the compliance certification in the building and
make the certification available for inspection upon request
from an entity with the relevant political subdivision with
authority to make such a request.
8. After the required testing and inspection, in the
event an inspection or test reveals deficiencies in smoke
dampers, fire dampers, or combination fire-and-smoke
dampers, the individual or individuals who conducted the
inspection or test shall prepare a deficiency report for the
building owner identifying the nature of the deficiency and
reasons for noncompliance. The deficiency report shall
100 contain the name of the individuals conducting the
101 inspection or test and that person's employer, the name of
102 the building owner, address of the property; the location of
103 all fire dampers, smoke dampers, and combination fire-and-
104 smoke dampers; and the date of the inspection or test. The
105 building owner shall, without delay, take the necessary
106 steps to ensure the defective equipment is replaced or
107 repaired and that compliance with the applicable inspection
108 and testing requirements has been achieved. A building that
109 does not achieve compliance within thirty days shall be in
110 violation of this section.
111 9. (1) The building owner shall post a notice of
112 verification of the testing and inspection of fire dampers,

SB 1659 5
113 smoke dampers, or combination fire-and-smoke dampers in the
114 outside lobby window of the building or other area clearly
115 visible to the public. The verification shall state the
116 address of the building and the date of the last fire damper
117 inspection, smoke damper inspection, and smoke control
118 system inspection, and the date that each inspection expires
119 in a form substantially similar to the following:
120 VERIFICATION OF FIRE SAFETY BUILDING INSPECTION
121 Building address: __________________
122 Date of Last Inspection of __________________
123 Fire Dampers, Smoke Dampers,
124 and Combination Fire/Smoke
125 Dampers:
126 Pass: Yes/No. Date of __________________
127 expiration of inspection:
128 Name of inspector: __________________
129 Date of Last Inspection of __________________
130 Smoke Control Systems:
131 Pass: Yes/No Date of __________________
132 Expiration of Inspection:
133 Name of inspector: __________________
134 (2) A written record of the smoke dampers, fire
135 dampers, combination fire-and-smoke dampers, and smoke
136 control systems testing and maintenance shall be maintained
137 on the premises. The written record shall include the date
138 of the maintenance, identification of the servicing
139 personnel, and notification of any unsatisfactory condition
140 and the corrective action taken, including parts replaced.

SB 1659 6
141 (3) Building owners shall submit copies of all valid
142 operation certificates to the department showing they are in
143 compliance with the testing requirements of this section
144 within thirty days of obtaining the certificate. The
145 department, state fire marshal, or entity within the
146 relevant political subdivision with authority to require
147 fire life-safety dampers shall commence enforcement actions
148 pursuant to this section in any instance of noncompliance
149 and review compliance when conducting investigations of
150 buildings for other reasons. When the department or local
151 enforcing agency acting pursuant to department regulations
152 conducts the annual fire inspection of any building that is
153 subject to this section, the department or enforcing agency
154 shall inspect the building owner's smoke dampers, fire
155 dampers, combination fire-and-smoke dampers certificate of
156 operation to ensure it complies with the requirements of
157 this section, inform the division of its inspection, and
158 commence enforcement actions if the local enforcing agency
159 finds violations. A local enforcing agency that discovers a
160 building owner's noncompliance shall report this
161 noncompliance to the division.
162 10. (1) Each failure to comply with any requirement
163 of this section shall constitute a violation of this section
164 and shall be subject to the administrative civil penalties
165 authorized by sections 320.200 to 320.273 and regulations
166 thereto. A civil penalty of not more than one thousand
167 dollars may be assessed for each violation and for each day
168 the violation continues.
169 (2) Pursuant to this section, the state fire marshal
170 may deny, suspend, or revoke any license, certificate,
171 approval, or other authorization issued under sections
172 320.200 to 320.273 when a person, firm, or entity fails to

SB 1659 7
173 comply with the state or local fire-prevention code,
174 including this section. This provision shall not deny the
175 local enforcing agencies either enforcement powers or
176 obligations.
177 (3) In accordance with this section, the state fire
178 marshal or division may seek injunctive relief in a court of
179 competent jurisdiction to restrain any continuing condition
180 that presents an imminent danger to life or property. This
181 provision shall not deny local enforcing agencies either
182 enforcement powers or obligations.
183 (4) Any administrative penalty order the state fire
184 marshal or division issues under this subsection shall state
185 the violation, the amount of the penalty, and the right to
186 request a hearing under chapter 536.
✓